Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2609
Registered office and registered agent to be maintained.

A limited liability company shall have and continuously maintain in this state:

(1) A registered office which may but need not be the same as its place of business; and

(2) A registered agent having a business office identical with the registered office, which agent may be an individual resident in this state, a domestic corporation, or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state.

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 9.
January 1, 2013